Utah statutes.
26-1-24.   Hearings conducted by department.

The department may hold hearings, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and take testimony in matters relating to the exercise and performance of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon the department. The department may, at its sole discretion, contract with any other agency or department of the state to conduct hearings in the name of the department.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

